District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.07

Instruments construed together and incorporate one another; when conflict arises.

The condominium instruments shall be construed together and shall be deemed to incorporate one another to the extent that any requirement of this chapter as to the content of one shall be deemed satisfied if the deficiency can be cured by reference to any of the others. If any conflict exists among the condominium instruments, the declaration controls, except that a construction consistent with this chapter controls in all cases over any inconsistent construction.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 207, 23 DCR 9532b

History

1981 Ed., § 45-1817.
1973 Ed., § 5-1217.

Prior Codifications